Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-308
Joint jail or farm; name.

Where such county and city unite in the construction of a jail, the name of such jail shall be city and county jail, and when they unite in the purchase of land for the employment of prisoners, such place of detention shall be called detention farm.

Laws 1913, c. 228, § 8, p. 662;

R.S.1913, § 3550;

C.S.1922, § 3023;

C.S.1929, § 47-208;

R.S.1943, § 47-308.